xetex/share/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyphen/uni-cyryoal.tex
% accompanying patterns for cyryo generated from ruhyphal.tex
% 2004-06-03 converted to Unicode for XeTeX, Jonathan Kew
%
\patterns{
а1бё
а1бьё
а5вё
а1вьё
а1дё
а1ё
а1жё
аз1вё
а1зё
а1кё
а1лё
а1льё
а1мё
а1мьё
а1нё
а1ньё
а1рё
а1рьё
а1сё
а1стё
а1тё
а1тьё
а1чё
а1ч2нё
а1чьё
а1шё
а1шьё
1бё
бё2д1р
2б1лён
блё2с1к
вё2д1р
вёз1до
1вёр.
2в1лён
.вып2лё
д1вё
дё1х
е1бё
е1бьё
е1вё
е1дё
е1ё
е1жё
е1зё
е1лё
е1льё
е1мё
ем1нё
е1нё
е1пё
еп1лё
е1рё
е1рьё
е1сё
е1стё
е3тё
е1тьё
е1чё
е1шё
е1щё
ё1ба
ё1бе
ё1бо
ё1бр
ё1бу
ё1бы
ё1ва
ё1ве
ё1во
ё1ву
ё1вы
ё1га
ё1ге
ё1ги
ё1го
ё1да
ё1де
ё1ди
ё1до
ё1ду
ё1жа
ёжа6т
ё1же
ё3жи
ё1жу
ё1жью
ё1за
ё1зе
ё1зо
ё1зу
ё1зы
ё1ка
ё1ке
ё1ки
ёк1н
2ё1ко
ё1ку
ё1ла
ё1ле
ё1ло
ё1лу
ё1лы
ё1ма
ё1ме
ё5ми
ём1не
ём1ного
ё1мо
ё1му
ём1ч
ё1мы
ё1на
ё1не
ё1но
ё1ну
ё1ны
ё1па
ё1пе
ёп1ле
ё1по
ёп1та
ё1пу
ё1пы
ё1ра
ё1ре
ё1ро
ё1ру
ё1ры
ё1рье
ё1рью
ё1рья
ё1са
ё1се
ё1си
ё1ск
ё1со
ё1сок.
ё1ста
ё5ста.
ё1сте
ё1стр
ё1сту
ё1сты
ё1су
ё1сы
ё1сье
ё1сьи
ё1сью
ё1сья
ё3та
ё3те
ё3ти
ёт1л
ё3то
ёт1р
ё3ту
ё3ты
ё1тю
ё3тя
ё1ха
ё1хе
ё1хи
ё2хк
ё1хо
ёх1о2к
ё1ху
ё1це
ё1че
ё1чи
ё1ша
ё1ше
ё1ши
ё1шу
ё1ща
ё1ще
ё1щи
ё1щу
5жёв
ж2жё
заё2
з1дё
з1нё
и1бё
и1бьё
и1вё
и1вьё
и1дё
и1ё
и1жё
и1зё
и1кё
и1лё
и1льё
2именё
и1мё
и1нё
иоб1рё
и5пё
и1рё
и1сё
и1стё
ис1тёк
и1тё
и1тьё
и1чё
и1чьё
и1шё
и1шьё
и1щё
1каё
1лёде
л1жё
5л6жёш
л1зё
л1чё
1мёд
1мён.
1мщё
неё6
нё2вра
но5ё
о1бё
.об1лё
.об1рё
о1бьё
о1вё
о1вьё
о1дё
о1ё
о1жё
о1жжё
о1жьё
о1зё
ои2мё
о1лё
о1льё
о1мё
о1нё
о1ньё
о1пё
о1пьё
о1рё
о1рьё
о1сё
ос1кё
о1снё
о1стё
о1счё
2о1тё
о1тьё
о1фё
о1чё
о1шё
о1шьё
о1щё
п6ё
п1лён
1п2лёнк
1п2лёнок
1п2лёноч
1плё2с1к
1п2лёт
поё2
причё2с1к
5проё6
ра3зорён
.ра2с1тё
.ра2с1тёк
ра2с1тёр
1рёза
рё2х1р
ро2г1нё
р1тё
1сё
1с2крёб
2стёрл
счё2с1к
съ2ё3ма
съё3мо
сы2п3лё
1т4вёрд
1течё
тёг1н
1тёка
тё2к1л
1тёкш
тём5н
тё2п1л
1тёрл
тё6хо
1тлё
.трёх1
трё2х
5тушёв
у1бё
у1бьё
у1вё
у1вьё
у1дё
.уё2
у1ё
у1жё
у1жьё
у5лё
у1льё
у1мё
у1нё
у1пё
у1пьё
у1рё
у1рьё
у1сё
у1стё
у1тё
у1тьё
у1чё
у1чьё
у1шё
у1щё
фё1д
2ф1лён
2х1вё
1хлёб
.ча2ё
чет1вёр
.четырёх1
1чёл
.чёр2ст1
ш2лём
ш6лёш
ъё2
ъём3н
ы1бё
ы1вё
ы1дё
ы1жё
ы1зё
ы1лё
ы1льё
ы1мё
ып1лё
ы1рё
ырё2х
ы1рьё
ы1сё
ы1тьё
ы1чё
ыш1лё
ь1вё
ь6щё
ю1дё
ю1ё
ю1нё
я1дё
я1жё
я1зё
я1нё
я1пьё
я1рё
я1сё
я1тё
я1чё
я1щё
}
